Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.215

Authority of director—Evidence.

If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation of this chapter, the director and the director's authorized representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and examination of any of the following, whether written or electronic: A listing of the contractors working on the property; contracts between the contractor and any suppliers or subcontractors; and any other information necessary to enforce this chapter. The subpoena may be issued only if a contractor fails to provide the above information when requested by the department. The superior court has the power to enforce such a subpoena by proper proceedings. This section applies to registered and unregistered contractors.

[ 2007 c 436 s 11.]